Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2153XS (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. 215 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 507B.4D Automobile loss settlements 1 ââ child restraint systems. 2 If an automobile insurance policy provides for the 3 settlement of an automobile partial loss or total loss, a 4 person shall include the value of any child restraint system 5 that is located in an automobile at the time the automobile 6 is subject to a partial loss or a total loss. For purposes 7 of this section, âautomobileâ has the same meaning as defined 8 in section 321.1, subsection 42, paragraph âdâ , and âchild 9 restraint systemâ has the same meaning as defined in section 10 321.446, subsection 7. 11 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to automobile 12 losses for automobiles that are subject to a partial loss or a 13 total loss occurring on or after July 1, 2025. 14